Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “health equity” has the meaning prescribed by
the Oregon Health Policy Board and adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule.
(2) The authority shall seek approval from the Centers for Medicare and  Medicaid Ser-
vices to:
(a) Require a coordinated care organization to spend up to  three percent of its global
budget on investments:
(A)(i) In programs or  services that improve health equity by addressing the preventable
differences in the  burden of disease, injury or violence or in opportunities to achieve optimal
health that are experienced by socially disadvantaged populations;
(ii) In community-based programs addressing the social determinants of health;
(iii) In efforts to diversify care locations; or
(iv) In programs or services that improve the overall health of the community; or
(B) That enhance payments to:
(i) Providers who address the need for culturally and linguistically appropriate services
in their communities;
(ii) Providers who can demonstrate that increased funding will improve  health services
provided to the community as a whole; or
Enrolled House Bill 3353 (HB 3353-B) Page 1
(iii) Support staff based in  the community that aid all underserved populations, including
but not limited to peer-to-peer support staff  with cultural backgrounds, health system
navigators in nonmedical settings and public guardians.
(b) Require a coordinated care organization to spend at least 30 percent of the funds de-
scribed in paragraph (a)  of this subsection on programs or efforts to achieve health equity
for racial, cultural or traditionally  underserved populations in the communities served by the
coordinated care organization.
(c) Require a  coordinated care organization to spend at least 20 percent of the funds de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection on efforts to:
(A) Improve the behavioral health of members;
(B) Improve the behavioral health care  delivery system in the community served by the
coordinated care organization;
(C) Create a culturally and linguistically competent health care workforce; or
(D) Improve the behavioral health of the community as a whole.
(3) Expenditures described in subsection (2) of this section are in addition  to the ex-
penditures required by ORS 414.572 (1)(b)(C) and must:
(a) Be part of a plan developed in collaboration with or directed by  members of organ-
izations or organizations that  serve local priority populations that are underserved in com-
munities served by the coordinated care organization, including but not limited to regional
health equity coalitions, and be approved by the coordinated care  organization’s community
advisory council;
(b) Demonstrate, through practice-based or community-based evidence, improved health
outcomes for individual members of the coordinated care organization or  the overall com-
munity served by the coordinated care organization;
(c) Be expended from a coordinated care  organization’s global budget with the least
amount of state funding; and
(d) Be counted as medical expenses by  the authority in a coordinated care organization’s
base medical budget when calculating the coordinated care organization’s global budget  and
flexible spending requirements for a given year.
(4) Expenditures by a coordinated  care organization in working with one or more of the
nine federally recognized tribes in  this state or urban Indian health programs to achieve
health equity may qualify as expenditures under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The authority shall:
(a) Make publicly available the outcomes described in subsection  (3)(b) of this section;
and
(b) Report expenditures under subsection (2) of this  section to the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services.
(6) Upon receipt of approval  from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to
carry out the provisions of this section, the authority shall adopt  rules in accordance with
the terms of the approval.
SECTION 3.
 Section 2 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section, “health equity”  has the meaning prescribed by the Oregon
Health Policy Board and adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule.
(2) The authority shall [ seek approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to ]:
(a) Require a coordinated care  organization to spend [ up to ] no less than  three percent of its
global budget on investments:
(A)(i) In programs or services that improve health equity  by addressing the preventable differ-
ences in the burden of disease, injury or violence  or in opportunities to achieve optimal health that
are experienced by socially disadvantaged populations;
(ii) In community-based programs addressing the social determinants of health;
(iii) In efforts to diversify care locations; or
(iv) In programs or services that improve the overall health of the community; or
Enrolled House Bill 3353 (HB 3353-B) Page 2
(B) That enhance payments to:
(i) Providers who address the need for  culturally and linguistically appropriate services in their
communities;
(ii) Providers who can demonstrate that increased funding will improve health services provided
to the community as a whole; or
(iii) Support staff based in the community that aid all underserved populations, including  but
not limited to peer-to-peer support staff with cultural backgrounds,  health system navigators in
nonmedical settings and public guardians.
(b) Require a coordinated care organization  to spend at least 30 percent of the funds described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection on  programs or efforts to achieve health equity for racial, cul-
tural or traditionally underserved populations in the communities served by  the coordinated care
organization.
(c) Require a coordinated care organization to spend at least  20 percent of the funds described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection on efforts to:
(A) Improve the behavioral health of members;
(B) Improve the behavioral health  care delivery system in the community served by the coordi-
nated care organization;
(C) Create a culturally and linguistically competent health care workforce; or
(D) Improve the behavioral health of the community as a whole.
(3) Expenditures described in subsection (2) of this section  are in addition to the expenditures
required by ORS 414.572 (1)(b)(C) and must:
(a) Be part of a plan developed in collaboration with  or directed by members of organizations
or organizations that serve local priority populations that are underserved  in communities served
by the  coordinated care organization, including but not limited to regional health equity coalitions,
and be approved by the coordinated care organization’s community advisory council;
(b) Demonstrate, through practice-based  or community-based evidence, improved health out-
comes for individual members of the  coordinated care organization or the overall community served
by the coordinated care organization;
(c) Be expended from a coordinated care organization’s global budget with the  least amount of
state funding; and
(d) Be counted as medical expenses by the authority in a coordinated  care organization’s base
medical budget when calculating the coordinated care organization’s global budget and  flexible
spending requirements for a given year.
(4) Expenditures by a coordinated care organization in working with one or more of  the nine
federally recognized tribes in this state or urban Indian health programs to achieve  health equity
may qualify as expenditures under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The authority shall:
(a) Make publicly available the outcomes described in subsection (3)(b) of this section; and
(b) Report expenditures under subsection (2) of this section to the  Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services.
[(6) Upon receipt of approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to carry out
the provisions of this section, the authority shall adopt  rules in accordance with the terms of the ap-
proval.]
(6) The authority shall convene an oversight committee in  consultation with the office
within the authority that is charged with ensuring equity and inclusion.  The oversight com-
mittee shall  be composed of members who represent the regional and demographic diversity
of this state based on statistical evidence compiled by  the authority about medical assistance
recipients and at least one representative from the nine  federally recognized tribes in this
state or urban Indian health programs. The oversight committee shall:
(a) Evaluate the impact of expenditures  described in subsection (2) of this section on
promoting health equity and improving the social determinants of health in the communities
served by each coordinated care organization;
Enrolled House Bill 3353 (HB 3353-B) Page 3
(b) Recommend best practices and  criteria for investments described in subsection (2)
of this section; and
(c) Resolve any disputes between the authority and a coordinated care organization  over
what qualifies as an expenditure under subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 4. (1) The amendments to section 2 of this 2021 Act by section 3 of this  2021
Act become operative upon  receipt of approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to carry out section 2 of this  2021 Act as described in section 2 (2) and (3)(c) of this
2021 Act.
(2) The Director  of the Oregon Health Authority shall notify the Legislative Counsel im-
mediately upon receipt of  an approval or denial by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to carry out section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3353 (HB 3353-B) Page 4